sk-SK: Účel použitia plsti: Na antukový kurt; Pre vysokú záťaž; Na trávnatý kurt; Do vysokej nadmorskej výšky; Pre bežnú záťaž; Iná
zh-TW: 毛氈耐用等級: 紅土球場級; 加厚級; 草地球場級; 高海拔級; 一般級; 其他
fr: Catégorie de feutre: Pour terre battue; Usage intensif; Pour gazon; Pour haute altitude; Usage standard; Autre
pt-BR: Resistência do feltro: Para quadra de saibro; Alta durabilidade; Para quadra de grama; Para alta altitude; Durabilidade regular; Outro
da: Slidstyrke: Til grusbane; Ekstra slidstærk; Til græsbane; Til store højder; Standard; Andet
ko: 펠트 등급: 클레이 코트용; 엑스트라 듀티; 잔디 코트용; 고지대용; 레귤러 듀티; 기타
tr: Keçenin işlevi: Toprak korta uygun; Ekstra dayanıklı; Çim korta uygun; Yüksek rakıma uygun; Standart kullanım; Diğer
zh-CN: 毛毡等级: 红土场适用; 硬地/超耐磨; 草地场适用; 高海拔适用; 常规耐磨; 其他
lt-LT: Veltinio paskirtis: Grunto dangai; Kietai dangai („Extra duty“); Žolės dangai; Aukštumoms; Standartinei dangai („Regular duty“); Kita
en: Felt duty: Clay court duty; Extra duty; Grass court duty; High altitude duty; Regular duty; Other
sv: Filtens belastningsklass: För grusbana; Extra slitstark; För gräsbana; För hög höjd; Standard; Övrigt
pt-PT: Feltro: Para campo de terra batida; Durabilidade extra; Para campo de relva; Para grande altitude; Uso regular; Outro
bg-BG: Клас на филца: За червени кортове; Висока издръжливост; За тревни кортове; За голяма надморска височина; Стандартна издръжливост; Друго
es: Fieltro: Para cancha de arcilla; Resistencia extra; Para cancha de césped; Para gran altitud; Resistencia regular; Otro
vi: Độ bền của nỉ: Dùng cho sân đất nện; Độ bền cao; Dùng cho sân cỏ; Dùng cho vùng cao; Độ bền tiêu chuẩn; Khác
ja: フェルト関税: クレーコート用; エクストラデューティ; グラスコート用; 高地用; レギュラーデューティ; その他
de: Filzklasse: Sandplatz; Extra Duty; Rasenplatz; Höhenlage; Regular Duty; Sonstige
cs: Plsť cla: Na antuku; Vysoká zátěž; Na trávu; Do vysoké nadmořské výšky; Běžná zátěž; Jiné
el: Κατηγορία χρήσης τσόχας: Για χωμάτινα γήπεδα; Υψηλής αντοχής; Για γήπεδα με γρασίδι; Για μεγάλο υψόμετρο; Κανονικής αντοχής; Άλλο
pl: Klasa filcu: Na korty ziemne (mączkę); Zwiększona trwałość (Extra Duty); Na korty trawiaste; Do gry na dużych wysokościach; Standardowa trwałość (Regular Duty); Inny
it: Categoria del feltro: Feltro per campi in terra rossa; Feltro extra resistente; Feltro per campi in erba; Feltro per alta quota; Feltro standard; Altro
hu: Filc kopásállósága: Salakpályás; Nagy igénybevételű; Füves pályás; Nagy magassághoz; Normál igénybevételű; Egyéb
th: ประเภทความหนาของผิวสักหลาด: สำหรับคอร์ตดิน; สำหรับฮาร์ดคอร์ต; สำหรับคอร์ตหญ้า; สำหรับพื้นที่สูง; ทนทานมาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de pâslă al mingii de tenis: Teren de zgură; Utilizare intensă; Teren de iarbă; Altitudine mare; Utilizare normală; Altele
sl-SI: Trpežnost filca: Za peščena igrišča; Za visoke obremenitve; Za travnata igrišča; Za visoke nadmorske višine; Za standardne obremenitve; Drugo
nb: Filt-tollskilt: Grusbane; Ekstra slitesterk; Gressbane; Høydebane; Standard slitesterk; Annet
nl: Viltklasse: Gravelbaangebruik; Extra duurzaam; Grasbaangebruik; Gebruik op grote hoogte; Normaal gebruik; Overig
hr-HR: Felt carine i povezane pristojbe: Za zemljane terene; Visoka izdržljivost (Extra duty); Za travnate terene; Za velike nadmorske visine; Normalna izdržljivost (Regular duty); Ostalo
ru: Категория фетра: Для грунтовых кортов; Повышенной износостойкости; Для травяных кортов; Для высокогорья; Стандартной износостойкости; Другое
fi: Huovan kulutuskestävyys: Massakenttäkäyttöön; Kovan kulutuksen; Ruohokenttäkäyttöön; Korkean ilmanalan; Normaalin kulutuksen; Muu